Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2313
Operator, defined.

Operator shall mean a person who manages or controls the functions of an underground facility but shall not include a person who is an owner or tenant of real property where underground facilities are located if the underground facilities are used exclusively to furnish services or commodities on the real property.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 13.